Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.974

State law enforcement mobilization—Regions established—Regional law enforcement mobilization committees—Regional law enforcement mobilization plans.

(1) Regions within the state are initially established as follows and may be adjusted as necessary by the state law enforcement policy board, but should remain consistent with the Washington state fire defense regions:

(a) Central region - Grays Harbor, Thurston, Pacific, and Lewis counties;

(b) Lower Columbia region - Kittitas, Yakima, and Klickitat counties;

(c) Mid-Columbia region - Chelan, Douglas, and Grant counties;

(d) Northeast region - Okanogan, Ferry, Stevens, Pend Oreille, Spokane, Adams, and Lincoln counties;

(e) Northwest region - Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, San Juan, and Island counties;

(f) Olympic region - Clallam and Jefferson counties;

(g) South Puget Sound region - Kitsap, Mason, King, and Pierce counties;

(h) Southeast region - Benton, Franklin, Walla Walla, Columbia, Whitman, Garfield, and Asotin counties;

(i) Southwest region - Wahkiakum, Cowlitz, Clark, and Skamania counties.

(2) Within each of the regions there is created a regional law enforcement mobilization committee. The committees shall consist of the sheriff of each county in the region, the district commander of the Washington state patrol from the region, a number of police chiefs within the region equivalent to the number of counties within the region plus one, and the director of the counties' emergency management office. The police chief members of each regional committee must include the chiefs of police of each city of ninety-five thousand or more population, and the number of members of the committee shall be increased if necessary to accommodate such chiefs. Members of each regional mobilization committee shall select a chair, who shall have authority to implement the regional plan, and a secretary as officers. Members serving on the regional mobilization committees shall not be eligible for reimbursement for meeting-related expenses from the state.

(3) The regional mobilization committees shall work with the relevant local government entities to facilitate development of intergovernmental agreements if any such agreements are required to implement a regional law enforcement mobilization plan.

(4) Regional mobilization committees shall develop regional law enforcement mobilization plans that include provisions for organized law enforcement agencies to respond across municipal, county, or regional boundaries. Each regional mobilization plan shall be consistent with the incident command system, the Washington state law enforcement mobilization plan, and regional response plans adopted prior to July 27, 2003.

(5) Each regional plan adopted under subsection (4) of this section shall be approved by the state law enforcement mobilization policy board before implementation.

[ 2003 c 405 s 10.]